New York, session 2025-2026, A8124.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 11 of section 310 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) the following to the extent that any projects are under the over- 4 sight or relating to the powers of: 5 Indian Point Decommissioning Oversight Board as established by the 6 Public Service Commission; 7 Indian Point Closure Task Force, as established in part RR of chapter 8 fifty-eight of the laws of two thousand seventeen. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 10 the amendments to subdivision 11 of section 310 of the executive law 11 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 12 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11703-01-5